Alabama, session 2026rs, HB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-48-241.05, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-48-241.05
(a) The county revenue commissioner shall collect and
pay into the general fund of the county all fees, percentages,
commissions, and other allowances which the tax assessor or
tax collector of the county is authorized and directed to
charge or collect for the performance of any duty imposed on
the county revenue commissioner.
(b) As compensation for the performance of the duties
of his or her office, the county revenue commissioner shall
receive an annual salary of sixty-seven thousand five hundred
dollars ($67,500).
(c) Effective beginning with the next term of office,
the annual salary of the county revenue commissioner shall be
one hundred six thousand, seven hundred eighty-one dollars
($106,781), payable in equal monthly installments from the
general fund of the county, and subsection (b) shall be void."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB194 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 29-Jan-26 Passed



Page 2